Rhode Island statutes. Title 40.1 Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Chapter 5 Mental Health Law
40.1-5-29.
Record of disclosure.

When any disclosure of information or records is made, the physician in charge of the patient or the professional person in charge of the facility, or his or her designee, shall promptly cause to be entered into the patient’s medical record the date and circumstances under which the disclosure was made, the names, and relationships to the patient, if any, of the person or agencies to whom the disclosure was made, and the information disclosed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1.

40.1-5-30.
Statistical data.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the compilation and publication of anonymous statistical data for use by government or researchers under standards.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1.

40.1-5-31.
Maintenance of facilities.

Facilities under the jurisdiction, supervision, and control of the department shall be maintained, and services shall be provided, for the care and treatment of the psychiatrically disabled of the state and for other persons and related purposes as shall be provided and authorized by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 100, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-20-17; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, §

40.1-5-17

; P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 11, § 7, effective June 27, 2022.

40.1-5-32.
Transfer of patients.

No transfer of a patient already in a facility shall be made to a facility, or section of a facility, maintained for patients certified upon an order of a court or judge having criminal jurisdiction in a proceeding arising out of a criminal offense. The official in charge of a facility, or the official’s designated agent, shall have reasonable discretion to order or permit transfers within a facility for reason of finances, adequacy of personnel, and upon conditions set forth in rules or regulations promulgated by the director pursuant hereto.

A patient certified to any facility pursuant to the provisions of this chapter may be transferred, with the patient’s consent or that of the patient’s guardian, to any facility within or without the state or to an institution operated by the Veterans’ Administration or to any agency of the United States government for the treatment of psychiatric disability at a facility under its jurisdiction, within or without the state, when deemed in the interest of the patient and approved by the transferring and receiving facilities. A transfer as above described may be accomplished without the consent of a patient, or the patient’s guardian, only upon prior application to, and a hearing in, the district court (or family court in the case of a patient under eighteen (18) years of age) and a specific finding by the court that the proposed transfer is in the best interests of the patient and is to a facility that will afford the patient the care and treatment necessary and appropriate to the patient’s condition.

A patient received on voluntary admission may be transferred as provided in subsection (b) with the patient’s consent; and if the patient shall not yet have attained the patient’s eighteenth birthday, with the consent of the patient’s parent, guardian, next of kin, or person who signed for his or her admission. A voluntary patient may be transferred to another facility without the patient’s consent only upon the filing of a petition for certification to the facility, and a finding of probable cause at a preliminary hearing in accordance with §

40.1-5-8

.

Patients transferred to facilities without the state, or to the Veterans’ Administration or the United States Public Health Service, or another agency operated by the United States government, shall be subject to the rules and regulations of the facility or institution to which they are transferred, and the person or official in charge thereof, in connection with the care and treatment of the patient, being vested with the same powers as persons in charge of similar facilities within the state, provided that no such transfer shall be made to a facility maintained for the purpose of patients committed upon an order of a court or judge having criminal jurisdiction in a proceeding arising out of a criminal offense. Transfers of patients between states that have entered into the interstate compact on mental health shall be pursuant to and in accordance with said compact whenever applicable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 168, § 6; G.L. 1956, § 40-20-15; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, §

40.1-5-15

; P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 30, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 80, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 11, § 7, effective June 27, 2022.

40.1-5-33.
Payment for care and treatment.

For the purposes of this chapter, facilities shall be maintained by the state for the care, treatment, and maintenance of the psychiatrically disabled, and the patients may be maintained and treated in the facilities or in foster family care, and may receive the services conditioned upon prompt and regular payments for the care, maintenance, and treatment or for the services in amounts as fixed by the director. In the discretion of the director, the rates so fixed may be the reimbursement rates or in excess thereof. A preference shall be given to persons whose estate, or the person or persons legally liable for their support, cannot sufficiently pay for the care and treatment, or for the services in licensed private facilities or from sources outside the department. The director, in the director’s discretion, may accept payments for services at less than the reimbursement rates, but the acceptance of the lesser payments shall not release the patient, the patient’s estate, or relatives, if they have sufficient financial ability, from the obligation to make up the difference between the amount fixed, accepted, or paid and the full reimbursement rates.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 100, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-20-18, Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, §

40.1-5-18

; P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 11, § 7, effective June 27, 2022.

40.1-5-34.
Exclusiveness of this chapter.

Where under any provision of any existing law, except in the case of a person held under criminal process, or under process of the family court for an act that would be considered a crime if committed by an adult, any person with psychiatric disability, as defined in this chapter, shall have recourse to or be dealt with as provided in this chapter, exclusively. This section shall prevail notwithstanding the provisions of § 14-1-5(1)(v).

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 100, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-20-20, Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, §

40.1-5-20

; P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 136; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 11, § 7, effective June 27, 2022.

40.1-5-35.
Support of poor or indigent patients.

The director may maintain without charge or defray the expense of care and treatment of such poor or indigent persons as are mentally disabled patients under treatment in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, who may have been admitted or certified to any facility under the provisions hereof. No person shall be denied care and treatment under the provisions of this chapter at any facility maintained by the state because he or she is unable to pay for the care and treatment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 100, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-20-21, Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, §

40.1-5-21

; P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1.

40.1-5-36.
Guardians ad litem.

At any hearing hereunder or upon application thereto, the district court, or family court in the case of a patient under eighteen (18) years of age, may appoint guardians ad litem to represent any patient in matters concerning the provisions of this chapter. It shall be the duty of the guardian ad litem to make an investigation of the facts, and to report the facts to the court with his or her recommendations if any.

The guardian ad litem shall be paid for his or her services, in an amount to be approved by the court, and the guardian ad litem’s services shall be paid from the estate of the patient, or if so ordered by the court, shall be paid by the state, and reimbursement shall be had by the state from the estate and assets of the patient, in the same manner as reimbursement for care and treatment is had by the state.

A party aggrieved by a final order of the court may seek review thereof in the supreme court by writ of certiorari in accordance with the procedures contained in §

42-35-16

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 100, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-20-22, Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, §

40.1-5-22

; P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 140, § 19.

40.1-5-37.
Service of process on patients.

No civil process or notice shall be served upon any patient, unless the officer or person charged with the service shall apply to the physician in charge of the facility, or his or her designated agent, where the patient is confined, and receive a statement from the physician that service of the process or notice will not be injurious to the mental health of the patient, and the statement shall be annexed to his or her return of service. In the event that the physician in charge, or his designated agent, shall state that it would be injurious to the mental health of the patient, the process or notice shall not be served on the patient and the statement shall be set forth in his or her return, and the court shall order notice of the process or notice to be published and shall appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the interests of the patient, whether the patient be otherwise represented or not.

History of Section.

1966, ch. 100, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-20-23, Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, §

40.1-5-23

; P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 215, § 1.

40.1-5-38.
Conspiracy to admit person improperly.

Any person who knowingly and willfully conspires with any other person unlawfully to improperly cause to be admitted or certified to any facility any person not covered by the provisions of this chapter, shall on conviction therefor, be fined not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisoned not exceeding five (5) years at the discretion of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 100, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-20-24, Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, §

40.1-5-24

; P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1.

40.1-5-39.
Deprivation of rights of persons admitted to facilities.

Any person who willfully withholds from or denies to any person admitted to a facility as defined in this chapter any of his or her rights as granted in this chapter, shall, on conviction thereof, be fined not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000) or imprisoned not exceeding two (2) years at the discretion of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 100, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-20-25, Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, §

40.1-5-25

; P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 136.

40.1-5-40.
Disciplinary action against employees of facilities.

Any employee of any facility who shall deny to or withhold from any patient any right granted him or her by this chapter shall, independently of the above criminal sanctions, be subject to such disciplinary action as the officer in charge shall see fit to impose, after notice, a hearing, and finding of a violation of the right.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 100, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-20-26, Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, §

40.1-5-26

; P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1.

40.1-5-40.1.
Duty to report.

Any employee who has reasonable cause to believe that an assault or a battery has been committed upon a patient shall make an immediate report, including the identity of parties and witnesses and details of the incident, to the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, or his or her designee. The director of the department shall cause the report to be investigated immediately and further shall notify the mental health advocate and appropriate law enforcement agencies of the investigation. Any person who fails to make a report shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 254, § 4; P.L. 2012, ch. 264, § 4.

40.1-5-40.2.
Immunity from liability for reporting patient abuse.

Any person, who, in good faith, makes a report pursuant to §

40.1-5-40.1

, excluding any perpetrator or conspirator of the acts, shall have immunity from any liability, civil or criminal, that might be incurred as a result of having made the report.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 145, § 1.

40.1-5-41.
Immunity of physicians and surgeons from liability.

Nothing contained herein shall be deemed to contravene the provisions of §

5-37-14

, and no physician or surgeon licensed to practice in this state, having met the requirements either of the statute or of this chapter, shall be made to answer in any court for his or her participation in any proceeding under this chapter except upon a showing of actual fraud; provided further, that no physician or surgeon shall be made to answer in any court for any damage or injury to any person or thing arising out of a patient’s enjoyment and/or exercise of rights protected by this chapter including, without limitation, discharge, where the enjoyment and/or exercise of the rights, or any of them, are in contravention of either the written orders or prescription or advice of a physician or surgeon.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 30, § 1.

40.1-5-42.
Severability.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part of this chapter shall be adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, the judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, section, or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment shall have been rendered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 100, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-20-27, Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, §

40.1-5-27

; P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1.

40.1-5-43.
Applicability to acts done, rights accruing, orders, or admissions prior to January 1, 1975.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall affect or impair the validity of any act done or right accruing, accrued, or acquired, or any order, judgment, or status established prior to January 1, 1975. As to any person admitted or certified pursuant to the provisions of the law prior to January 1, 1975, the prior law shall continue to govern until six (6) months thereafter, whereupon the provisions of this chapter shall apply in all respects.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 100, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 40-20-28, Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; G.L. 1956, §

40.1-5-28

; P.L. 1974, ch. 119, § 1.